Indiana, session 2026, HB1309.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-7-2-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) The following definitions apply throughout
this section:
(1) "Goods" means merchandise, equipment, products,
supplies, or materials.
(2) "Home based business" means a business:
(A) for the manufacture, provision, or sale of goods or
services; and
(B) that is owned and operated by:
(i) the owner; or
(ii) a tenant;
of a residential dwelling.
(3) "No impact home based business" means a home based
business to which all of the following apply:
(A) The total number of on-site employees and clients do
not exceed the municipal occupancy limit for the
2026 IN 1309—LS 7082/DI 87


residential dwelling.
(B) The business activities:
(i) are limited to the legal sale of goods and services;
(ii) do not generate on-street parking or a substantial
increase in traffic through the residential area;
(iii) occur inside the residential dwelling or in the yard;
and
(iv) are not visible from the street.
(b) The use of a residential dwelling for a no impact home based
business is a permitted use. A municipality may not:
(1) prohibit a no impact home based business; or
(2) require a person to apply, register, or obtain:
(A) a permit;
(B) a license;
(C) a variance; or
(D) any other type of approval;
from the municipality to operate a no impact home based business.
(c) This section does not supersede any of the following:
(1) A deed restriction, covenant, or agreement restricting the
use of land.
(2) A deed, bylaw, or other document of a homeowners
association or condominium association.
(d) A municipality may establish reasonable regulations for a no
impact home based business, if the regulations are narrowly
tailored for any of the following purposes:
(1) The protection of public health and safety, including rules
and regulations related to:
(A) fire and building codes;
(B) health and sanitation;
(C) transportation or traffic control;
(D) solid or hazardous waste; and
(E) pollution and noise control.
(2) Ensuring that the business activity is:
(A) compatible with residential use of the property and
surrounding residential use;
(B) secondary to the use as a residential dwelling;
(C) complying with state and federal law; and
(D) paying applicable taxes.
(3) Limiting or prohibiting the use of a no impact home based
business for the following purposes:
(A) To operate a structured sober living home.
(B) To manufacture, exhibit, distribute, or sell illegal
2026 IN 1309—LS 7082/DI 87


drugs, liquor, pornography, or obscenity.
(C) To operate an adult entertainment establishment (as
defined in IC 12-7-2-1.8).
(e) A municipality may not require a person as a condition of
operating a no impact home based business to:
(1) rezone the property for commercial use; or
(2) install or equip fire sprinklers in a:
(A) single family detached residential dwelling; or
(B) residential dwelling with not more than two (2)
dwelling units.
(f) The question of whether a regulation complies with this
section shall be subject to judicial review. The municipality
enacting the regulation must establish by clear and convincing
evidence that the regulation complies with this section.
2026 IN 1309—LS 7082/DI 87